apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/s:emamucuyll__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sl:v.emamallou</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>sl:v.emamallou</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sl:v.emamallou</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hm.sl:emalley</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hm.sl:emalley</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylsl:emacuell</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylsl:emacuell</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:emamucuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:emamycuoll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:emamycuoll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eils:emamuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eils:emamuyll</l> 
        <r>s:emamucuyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>







    <pardef n="el__detnt">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="detnt"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    

<pardef n="/ömadohe-i__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>elömamywo-y-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elömamywo-y-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylömamawoo-y-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylömamawoo-y-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömadoheby-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömadohe-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylömawei-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylömaweiby-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömawey-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ömaweybo-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elömamuwy-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elömamuwybo-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylömawei-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylömaweibo-i</l> 
        <r>ömadohe-i<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="el"><i>el</i><par n="el__detnt"/></e>
<e lm="s:emamucuyll"><par n="/s:emamucuyll__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ömadohe-i"><par n="/ömadohe-i__vblex"/></e>
